en: Basketball Backboards
xx: Basketball Backboards
cs: Basketbalové desky
da: Basketballbagplader
de: Basketball-Korbbretter
es: Tableros de baloncesto
fr: Panneaux de basket-ball
it: Tabelloni da basket
ja: バスケットゴール用バックボード
nl: Basketbalborden
no: Basketballtavler
pl: Tablice do koszykówki
pt: Tabelas de basquete
ru: Баскетбольные щиты
sv: Basketstoppbrädor
tr: Basketbol Panyaları

en: Basketball Hoop Padding
xx: Basketball Hoop Padding
cs: Ochrana stojanu basketbalového koše
da: Beklædning til basketballring
de: Schutzverkleidung für Basketballkörbe
es: Protectores para canastas de baloncesto
fr: Mousse de protection pour paniers de basket-ball
it: Cuscinetti per anelli da basket
ja: バスケットゴール用パッド
nl: Bescherming basketbalringen
no: Polstring til basketballmål
pl: Obicia do koszy
pt: Acolchoado para aro de basquete
ru: Амортизирующие подкладки для баскетбола
sv: Stoppning för basketbollringar
tr: Basketbol Pota Koruması

en: Basketball Hoop Posts
xx: Basketball Hoop Posts
cs: Stojany na basketbalové koše
da: Basketballstandere
de: Basketballständer
es: Postes para canastas de baloncesto
fr: Poteaux de basket-ball
it: Pali per canestri da basket
ja: バスケットゴール用ポール
nl: Basketbalpalen
no: Basketballstolper
pl: Słupy koszy
pt: Tabela de basquete com pé
ru: Баскетбольные стойки
sv: Basketstolpar
tr: Basketbol Pota Direkleri

en: Basketball Nets
xx: Basketball Nets
cs: Basketbalové síťky
da: Basketballnet
de: Basketballnetze
es: Redes de baloncesto
fr: Filets de basket-ball
it: Reti da basket
ja: バスケットゴール用ネット
nl: Basketbalnetten
no: Basketball-net
pl: Siatki do koszykówki
pt: Redes de basquete
ru: Баскетбольные сетки
sv: Basketnät
tr: Basketbol Ağları

en: Basketball Rims
xx: Basketball Rims
cs: Basketbalové obroučky
da: Basketballkurveringe
de: Basketballringe
es: Aros de baloncesto
fr: Anneaux de basket-ball
it: Cerchi da basket
ja: バスケットゴール用リング
nl: Basketbalringen
no: Basketball-ringer
pl: Obręcze do koszy
pt: Aros da cesta de basquete
ru: Баскетбольные кольца
sv: Basketringar
tr: Basketbol Çemberleri

en: Basketball Hoops
xx: Basketball Hoops
cs: Basketbalové koše
da: Basketballkurve
de: Basketballkörbe
es: Canastas de baloncesto
fr: Paniers de basket-ball, Cercle de basket
it: Canestri da basket
ja: バスケットゴール
nl: Basketbalstaanders
no: Basketballkurver
pl: Kosze do gry w koszykówkę
pt: Cestas de basquete
ru: Баскетбольные корзины
sv: Basketkorgar
tr: Basketbol Potaları

en: Basketball Training Aids
xx: Basketball Training Aids
cs: Tréninkové pomůcky na basketbal
da: Træningsudstyr til basketball
de: Basketball-Trainingshilfen
es: Accesorios para entrenamiento de baloncesto
fr: Matériel d'entraînement de basket-ball
it: Supporti di allenamento per il basket
ja: バスケットボール練習器具
nl: Hulpmiddelen voor basketbaltraining
no: Hjelpemidler for basketballtrening
pl: Sprzęt treningowy do koszykówki
pt: Equipamentos auxiliares para treinar basquete
ru: Баскетбольные тренажеры
sv: Träningshjälpmedel för basketboll
tr: Basketbol Eğitim Araçları

en: Basketballs
xx: Basketballs
cs: Basketbalové míče
da: Bolde til basketball
de: Basketbälle
es: Pelotas de baloncesto
fr: Ballons de basket-ball
it: Palle da basket
ja: バスケットボール
nl: Basketballen
no: Basketball-baller
pl: Piłki do koszykówki
pt: Bolas de basquete
ru: Баскетбольные мячи
sv: Basketbollar
tr: Basketbol Topları

en: Boxing & Martial Arts
xx: Boxing & Martial Arts
cs: Box a bojové sporty
da: Boksning og kampsport
de: Boxen & Kampfsport
es: Boxeo y artes marciales
fr: Boxe et arts martiaux
it: Boxe e arti marziali
ja: ボクシング・格闘技
nl: Boksen en vechtsporten
no: Boksing og kampsport
pl: Boks i sztuki walki
pt: Boxe e artes marciais
ru: Товары для бокса и боевых искусств
sv: Boxning och kampsporter
tr: Boks ve Dövüş Sporları

en: Boxing & Martial Arts Protective Gear
xx: Boxing & Martial Arts Protective Gear
cs: Ochranné pomůcky pro box a bojové sporty
da: Bokse- og kampsportsudstyr
de: Boxschutzbekleidung
es: Equipo de protección para boxeo y artes marciales
fr: Équipement de protection pour la boxe et les arts martiaux, Coque de protection (sport), Coquille de protection (sport), Dorsale, Pattes d'ours (boxe), coque de protection de handball, coquille de protection
it: Attrezzatura protettiva pugilato
ja: ボクシング・格闘技用プロテクター
nl: Beschermende uitrusting voor boksen
no: Beskyttelsesutstyr for boksing og kampsport
pl: Ochraniacze do boksu i sztuk walki
pt: Equipamentos de proteção para boxe e artes marciais
ru: Защитная экипировка для бокса
sv: Skyddsutrustning för boxning och kampsport
tr: Boks ve Dövüş Sanatları Koruyucu Giysileri

en: Boxing & MMA Hand Wraps
xx: Boxing & MMA Hand Wraps
cs: Bandáže na box a MMA
da: Håndbind til boksning og kampsport
de: Handbandagen
es: Vendas para manos para boxeo y artes marciales mixtas
fr: Bandages de mains pour la boxe et le combat libre
it: Fasce per le mani per boxe e arti marziali
ja: ボクシング・総合格闘技用ハンドラップ
nl: Handbandages voor boksen en MMA
no: Håndbind for boksing og kampsport
pl: Bandaże bokserskie i do MMA
pt: Bandagens de boxe e MMA
ru: Бинты для рук для бокса и смешанных боевых искусств
sv: Handlindor för boxning
tr: Boks ve MMA Bandajları

en: Boxing & Martial Arts Arm Guards
xx: Boxing & Martial Arts Arm Guards
cs: Chrániče rukou a předloktí na box a bojové sporty
da: Armbeskyttere til boksning og kampsport
de: Armschutz
es: Protectores para brazos para boxeo y artes marciales
fr: Protège avant-bras de boxe et arts martiaux
it: Protezioni per le braccia per boxe e arti marziali
ja: ボクシング・格闘技用アームガード
nl: Armbeschermers voor boksen en vechtsporten
no: Armbeskyttere for boksing og kampsport
pl: Ochraniacze na ręce do boksu i sztuk walki
pt: Protetores de braço para boxe e artes marciais
ru: Щитки для рук для бокса и боевых искусств
sv: Armskydd för boxning och kampsporter
tr: Boks ve Dövüş Sporları Kol Koruyucuları

en: Boxing & Martial Arts Body Protectors
xx: Boxing & Martial Arts Body Protectors
cs: Chrániče těla na box a bojové sporty
da: Kropsbeskyttelse til boksning og kampsport
de: Körperschutz
es: Protectores corporales para boxeo y artes marciales
fr: Plastrons de boxe et arts martiaux
it: Protezioni per il corpo per boxe e arti marziali
ja: ボクシング・格闘技用ボディプロテクター
nl: Lichaamsbeschermers voor boksen en vechtsporten
no: Kroppsbeskyttere for boksing og kampsport
pl: Ochraniacze tułowia do boksu i sztuk walki
pt: Protetores corporais para boxe e artes marciais
ru: Защита корпуса для бокса и боевых искусств
sv: Kroppsskydd för boxning och kampsporter
tr: Boks ve Dövüş Sporları Vücut Koruyucuları

en: Boxing & Martial Arts Headgear
xx: Boxing & Martial Arts Headgear
cs: Chrániče hlavy na box a bojové sporty
da: Hovedbeskyttelse til boksning og kampsport
de: Kopfschutz
es: Protectores de cabeza para boxeo y artes marciales
fr: Casques de boxe et arts martiaux
it: Protezioni per la testa per boxe e arti marziali
ja: ボクシング・格闘技用ヘッドギア
nl: Hoofdbeschermers voor boksen en vechtsporten
no: Hodebeskyttelse for boksing og kampsport
pl: Kaski bokserskie i do sztuk walki
pt: Capacetes para boxe e artes marciais
ru: Шлемы для бокса и боевых искусств
sv: Huvudskydd för boxning och kampsporter
tr: Boks ve Dövüş Sporları Başlıkları

en: Boxing Gloves & Mitts
xx: Boxing Gloves & Mitts
cs: Boxerské rukavice a návleky
da: Boksehandsker
de: Boxhandschuhe
es: Guantes y manoplas de boxeo
fr: Mitaines et gants de boxe
it: Guanti da pugilato e guantoni da baseball
ja: ボクシング用グローブ・ミット
nl: Bokshandschoenen en mitts
no: Boksehansker
pl: Rękawice bokserskie
pt: Luvas de boxe
ru: Боксерские перчатки
sv: Boxhandskar
tr: Boks Eldivenleri ve Kolçaklar

en: MMA Shin Guards
xx: MMA Shin Guards
cs: Chrániče holení na MMA
da: Benskinner til MMA
de: Schienbeinschoner
es: Protectores de barbilla para artes marciales mixtas
fr: Protège-tibias d'arts martiaux mixtes
it: Parastinchi per arti marziali miste
ja: 総合格闘技用レガース
nl: Scheenbeschermers voor MMA
no: Leggskinner for MMA
pl: Ochraniacze na goleń do MMA
pt: Caneleiras de MMA
ru: Средства защиты голеней для смешанных боевых искусств
sv: Smalbensskydd för MMA
tr: MMA Tekmelikleri

en: Boxing & Martial Arts Training Equipment
xx: Boxing & Martial Arts Training Equipment
cs: Tréninkové vybavení na box a bojové sporty
da: Træningsudstyr til boksning og kampsport
de: Trainingsausrüstung für Boxen & Kampfsport
es: Equipamiento de entrenamiento para boxeo y artes marciales
fr: Équipement d'entraînement à la boxe et aux arts martiaux
it: Attrezzature per l'allenamento per boxe e arti marziali
ja: ボクシング・格闘技用練習器具
nl: Benodigdheden voor boks- en vechtsporttraining
no: Treningsutstyr for boksing og kampsport
pl: Trening bokserski i sztuk walki
pt: Equipamento de treinamento para boxe e artes marciais
ru: Тренажеры для бокса и боевых искусств
sv: Träningsutrustning för boxning och kampsporter
tr: Boks ve Dövüş Sporları Eğitim Ekipmanları

en: Boxing & MMA Punch Mitts
xx: Boxing & MMA Punch Mitts
cs: Lapy na box a MMA
da: Handsker til boksning og MMA
de: Boxpratzen
es: Mitones para boxeo y artes marciales mixtas
fr: Mitaines d'entraîneur de boxe et combat libre
it: Guanti da passata per boxe e arti marziali
ja: ボクシング・総合格闘技用パンチングミット
nl: Handstootkussens voor boksen en MMA
no: Slaghansker for boksing og kampsport
pl: Rękawice bokserskie i do MMA
pt: Luvas de boxe e MMA
ru: Лапы для бокса и смешанных боевых искусств
sv: Mittsar för boxning och kampsporter
tr: Boks ve MMA Lapaları

en: Grappling Dummies
xx: Grappling Dummies
cs: Bojové figuríny
da: Dummies til brydning
de: Training-Dummys
es: Muñecos para entrenamiento de lucha
fr: Mannequins pour la lutte
it: Manichini da allenamento
ja: 練習用ダミー人形
nl: Worstelpoppen
no: Brytedukker
pl: Kukły do walki na chwyty
pt: Bonecos de luta corpo a corpo
ru: Манекены для захватов
sv: Träningsdockor
tr: Dövüş Mankenleri

en: Punching & Training Bag Accessories
xx: Punching & Training Bag Accessories
cs: Boxovací pytle – příslušenství
da: Bokse- og træningspuder – tilbehør
de: Box- & Trainingssackzubehör
es: Accesorios para punchings y sacos de entrenamiento
fr: Accessoires pour punching-balls
it: Accessori per sacchi e colpitori
ja: サンドバッグ関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor boksballen en oefenzakken
no: Tilbehør til bokse- og treningssekker
pl: Akcesoria do worków treningowych
pt: Acessórios para treinos e sacos de boxe
ru: Принадлежности для боксерских и тренировочных груш
sv: Tillbehör till sandsäckar och träningssäckar
tr: Kum Torbası ve Antrenman Torba Aksesuarları